Illinois, session 104th, SB2036.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 522-101 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/22-101 new)7    Sec. 22-101. Out-of-school time.8    (a) The General Assembly declares that it is the policy of 9this State to provide all young people between the ages of 6 10and 19 with access to quality out-of-school time (OST) 11programs through a State commitment to sufficient and 12sustainable funding for programs that promote positive youth 13development. Further, this State is a national leader in the 14community schools model which helps strengthen OST programs 15through school and community partnerships in order to meet the 16whole needs of all children and youth. The need for this policy 17is based on a series of facts.18    The General Assembly finds that youth who are engaged in 19quality OST activities and community schools are more likely 20to succeed in academics, employment, and civic affairs than 21youth who do not participate in OST activities. Youth with 22high levels of participation in quality OST programs miss 23fewer days of school, have lower drop-out rates, and higher   SB2036- 2 -LRB104 09809 LNS 19876 b1rates of graduation. Further, juvenile crime peaks in the 2after school hours and OST programs help prevent crime 3victimization and help youth to make healthy choices.4    The General Assembly also finds that youth in this State 5face greater barriers to accessing OST programs than ever 6before:7        (1) Demand for programs far outpaces the supply of 8    programs.9        (2) Funding is fragmented among State agencies.10        (3) The path to accessing public funding is often 11    difficult.12        (4) Funding inconsistencies make it difficult to 13    maintain a qualified OST workforce.14    The General Assembly also finds that the State, having 15demonstrated national leadership in advancing youth 16development must also expand OST programming in order to 17realize the full, continued benefits of public investment in 18the State's young people.19    (b) As used in this Section:20    "Community school" means public schools that work with the 21community to improve student outcomes and address the needs of 22the whole child. All community schools are unique and 23responsive to their community; however, they all include 24integrated student supports, expanded learning, family 25engagement, and collaborative leadership.26    "Out-of-school time" or "OST" means positive youth   SB2036- 3 -LRB104 09809 LNS 19876 b1development activities provided to youth between the ages of 6 2and 19 during the hours before or after school, during school 3year and summer recess from school, or during the weekends, 4including, but not limited to: academic support; arts, music, 5sports, cultural enrichment, and other recreation; health 6promotion and diseases prevention; life skills and work and 7career development; and youth leadership development.8    (c) There is hereby established the Out-of-School Time 9(OST) Advisory Council for the purpose of providing 10information and advice to the Governor and State agencies 11regarding State and federal policy and funding issues 12affecting out of school time programs based on regular and 13systematic input from providers.14        (1) The OST Advisory Council shall include 15    representation from both public and private organizations 16    comprised of the following:17            (A) Four members of the General Assembly: one 18        appointed by the President of the Senate; one 19        appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate; one 20        appointed by the Speaker of the House of 21        Representatives; and one appointed by the Minority 22        Leader of the House of Representatives.23            (B) Representatives from the State Board of 24        Education, the Department of Human Services, the 25        Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority, and 26        the Department of Early Childhood.  SB2036- 4 -LRB104 09809 LNS 19876 b1            (C) Three OST providers from various settings.2            (D) A community school lead partner agency.3            (E) A private philanthropic funder.4            (F) A principal of a school that has OST or the 5        community schools model.6            (G) A superintendent of a school district that has 7        OST or the community schools model.8            (H) An OST researcher or evaluator.9            (I) Additional public members that have an 10        interest in OST, including law enforcement, business, 11        and youth advocacy.12        The OST Advisory Council membership shall be 13    representative of the diversity of out-of-school programs, 14    regarding geography, size, and public or nonpublic 15    operation.16        (2) The Governor shall designate one of the OST 17    Advisory Council members who is a nongovernment 18    stakeholder to serve as co-chairperson and a State agency 19    representative as a chair.20        (3) The OST Advisory Council shall meet no less than 4 21    times a year.22    (d) The OST Advisory Council shall do all of the 23following:24        (1) Provide information on the status of funding 25    provided for OST programs in each fiscal year, including 26    the number of applications received, the number of   SB2036- 5 -LRB104 09809 LNS 19876 b1    applications funded, and the amount and timing of 2    committed funding.3        (2) Provide recommendations on legislative and 4    administrative action needed to ensure that funding for 5    before and after school programs is allocated promptly to 6    qualified providers of OST programs.7        (3) Provide information on the quality of services and 8    accountability measures that are appropriate for 9    school-age children and youth.10        (4) Provide information regarding challenges faced by 11    OST programs that impede the provision of the best 12    possible services.13        (5) Provide recommendations on the equitable reach of 14    OST programs to ensure that the State has policies in 15    place that promote access to the children and youth most 16    in need of services, including, but not limited to, 17    students of color, low-income communities, rural 18    communities and other marginalized communities.19        (6) Make recommendations to the Governor and State 20    agencies on reporting requirements, priority points, 21    statewide evaluation, and licensure for OST programs.22        (7) Create and deliver to the Governor and General 23    Assembly an annual report on statewide successes in OST 24    and areas of growth for the future.